Rhode Island, session 2025, SB998.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 46-23-2, 46-23-2.1 and 46-23-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-
23 entitled "Coastal Resources Management Council" are hereby amended to read as follows:
46-23-2. Coastal resources management council created — Appointment of members.
(a) There is hereby created the coastal resources management council. The coastal
resources management council shall consist of ten (10) members. Nine (9) members shall be
appointed by the governor, with advice and consent of the senate, and one member shall serve ex
officio. All current appointments to the coastal resources management council made by the
governor with advice and consent of the senate are hereby validated and ratified and those
appointees shall serve until a new seven (7) member council is selected pursuant to subsection (b)
of this section or for the remainder of their term, whichever shall occur first.
(1) Six (6) of the members shall be appointed or elected officials of local government: three
(3) of whom shall be appointed or elected officials in a municipality of fewer than twenty-five
thousand (25,000) in population, three (3) of whom shall be appointed or elected officials in a
municipality of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) in population. The populations are to be
determined by the latest federal census. Elected or appointed municipal officials shall hold seats on
the council only so long as they remain in their elected or appointed office. Each municipal
appointment shall cease if the appointed or elected official shall no longer hold or change the office
which they held upon appointment. At least five (5) out of the six (6) appointed or elected members

must be appointed or elected in a coastal municipality. When the governor submits his or her
appointments to the senate for advice and consent, the governor shall specify the appointed or
elected office that each municipal appointment holds; the population of the municipality
represented; and the member being replaced.
(2) Three (3) members shall be appointed by the governor from the public, with the advice
and consent of the senate, one of the public members and his or her successors shall reside in a
coastal municipality.
(3) All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified; during the
month of January, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a member
to succeed the members whose term will then next expire for a term of three (3) years commencing
on the first day of February next following and until their successor is named and qualified. A
member shall be eligible for successive appointments. No more than two (2) persons on the council
shall be from the same municipality. A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the
manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term.
(4) The director of the department of environmental management, or their designee, shall
serve ex officio. The ex-officio member shall not be counted as serving from any particular
municipality.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, on March 1, 2026, all current members
of the coastal resources management council shall have their terms expire. In anticipation thereof,
prior to March 1, 2026, the governor shall appoint a coastal resources management council that
shall consist of seven (7) voting members, one of whom shall be the director of the department of
environmental management who shall serve ex officio. The six (6) remaining members shall be
public members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. All appointed
members shall possess background, qualifications and expertise in environmental and coastal
management matters, provided that one of whom shall be an engineer; one of whom shall be a
coastal biologist; and one of whom shall be a representative of an environmental organization.
Current or past service on the coastal resources management council shall not disqualify an
individual from reappointment pursuant to this subsection. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the
seven (7) member council is not seated by March 1, 2026 in accordance with this section, the
members appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall continue to serve until such time
as all members are appointed and confirmed in accordance with this section.
(b)(c) In addition to the foregoing voting members, the coastal resources management
council may include a varying number of other members who may serve in an advisory capacity
without the right to vote and who may be invited to serve by either the governor or the voting
LC002728/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 6

members. These advisory members may represent the federal agencies such as the navy, coast
guard, corps of engineers, public health service, and the Federal Water Pollution Control
Administration, and such regional agencies as the New England River Basins Commission and the
New England Regional Commission and any other group or interest not otherwise represented.
(c)(d) There may be established a coastal resources advisory committee which committee,
appointed by the executive director of the coastal resources management council, may include, but
not be limited to, representation from the following groups: one of whom may be a representative
of the university of Rhode Island graduate school of oceanography and the college of resources
development, one of whom may be a representative of the Sea Grant National College Program,
one of whom may be a representative of the army corps of engineers, one of whom may be a
representative of the federal environmental protection agency’s Narragansett Bay laboratory, one
of whom shall be a representative of the coastal resources management council, one of whom may
be the director of the department of environmental management; one of whom may be a member
of the Rhode Island Marine Trade Association and one of whom may be a representative of a
regional environmental group. The coastal resources management council shall have the authority
to appoint these additional members to the advisory committee as is deemed necessary or advisable
by the advisory committee or the council. It shall be the responsibility of the committee to advise
the coastal resources management council on environmental coastal resources management issues
relating to dredging and permitting related thereto, including, but not limited to, those issues
defined in §§ 46-23-18.1 — 46-23-18.3, inclusive.
(d)(e) The council shall have the authority to form committees of other advisory groups as
needed from both its own members and others.
46-23-2.1. Members — Term of office — Vacancies.
(a) The term of office of the appointed members shall be three (3) years, only so long as
the members shall remain eligible to serve on the council under the appointment authority.
(1) Subject to the provisions of § 46-23-2, all members shall serve until their successors
are appointed and qualified.
(2) Term limits on the coastal resources management council shall be determined by the
governor as follows: two (2) appointees shall serve an initial term of three (3) years and shall be
eligible for reappointment in accordance with this section; two (2) appointees shall serve an initial
term of two (2) years and shall be eligible for reappointment in accordance with this section; and
two (2) appointees shall serve an initial term of one year and shall be eligible for reappointment in
accordance with this section.
(3) After the expiration of the terms of all initial members pursuant to this subsection,
LC002728/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 6

succeeding appointments shall be for a term of three (3) years, and during the month of January,
the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a member to succeed the
member whose term will then next expire for a term of three (3) years commencing on the first day
of February next following and until a successor is named and qualified.
(b) The members are eligible for successive appointments.
(c) Elected or appointed municipal officials shall hold seats on the coastal resources
management council, only so long as they remain in their elected or appointed office.
(d) A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the manner of the original
appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term. Any person appointed to fill said
vacancy shall complete the unexpired term and shall then be eligible for reappointment pursuant to
this section. The governor shall have the power to remove his or her appointee for just cause.
46-23-4. Officers of the council — Quorum and vote required for action.
The governor shall select from the appointed members a chairperson and vice chairperson.
The coastal resources management council shall thereupon select a secretary from among its
membership or staff. The council may engage staff, including legal counsel, as it deems necessary.
A quorum shall consist of six (6) members of the council provided, however, for the council
appointed pursuant to § 46-23-2(b) a quorum shall consist of four (4) members of the council. A
majority vote of those present shall be required for action.
SECTION 2. Section 46-23-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-23 entitled "Coastal
Resources Management Council" is hereby repealed.
46-23-12. Representation from coastal communities.
Upon the expiration of a term of a member appointed by the governor, as an appointed or
elected official of local government from a coastal municipality as set out in § 46-23-2, the governor
shall appoint an appointed or elected official of a coastal municipality which, at the time of the
governor’s appointment, has no appointed or ex officio representation on the council.
SECTION 3. Chapter 46-23 of the General Laws entitled "Coastal Resources Management
Council" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-23-27. Effective date.
(a) Within thirty (30) business days of the date of passage of this section, the council shall
post for notice and comment revisions of its coastal resources management program (referred to as
"red book") and management procedures in order to implement the changes to the council.
(b) Within fourteen (14) days of promulgation of the revised coastal resources management
program (referred to as "red book") and management procedures, the council shall submit a coastal
zone management act program change request to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
LC002728/SUB A/2 - Page 4 of 6

Administration (NOAA) for the approval of the amendments to this chapter and the management
procedures.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002728/SUB A/2
========
LC002728/SUB A/2 - Page 5 of 6